Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,137
Investments.

With the exception of investments made in accordance with subdivision (1) of section 44-32,122, the investable funds of a health maintenance organization shall be invested only as authorized under the Insurers Investment Act for a domestic life insurance company.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 46;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 69.

Insurers Investment Act, see section 44-5101.